Georgia, session 2025_26, HB768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to continue and re-create the State Court of Gwinnett County, approved March 23,
1977 (Ga. L. 1977, p. 3331), as amended, is amended by adding a new subsection to
Section 13 to read as follows:
"(c.1) The governing authority of Gwinnett County shall provide from county funds
supplements to the compensation otherwise provided for in this Act for the chief judge of
said court in the amount of $10,000.00 per year, to be paid in 12 equal monthly payments.
The supplement provided by this section shall be in addition to any other compensation or
supplements provided to each judge of the court."
H. B. 768
- 1 -

LC 47 3587/AP
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on June 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 768
- 2 -